Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Pesticide Application and Certification.

§ 3.2-3929.
Restricted use pesticides prohibited; exceptions; training required.

No person shall use any pesticide classified for restricted use unless that person: (i) has first complied with the certification requirements of the Board; (ii) is under the direct supervision of a certified applicator on-site and training for certification as a commercial applicator or registered technician; or (iii) is producing an agricultural commodity while under the direct supervision of a private applicator on property owned or leased by that private applicator.

The Board may specify by regulation the amount of training and service required to qualify a person for each classification or subclassification of certification as a commercial applicator or registered technician.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.3; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.51; 1993, c. 773; 1995, c. 103; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to the conditional exemption of regulations adopted under this section from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4006

.

Law Review.

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

§ 3.2-3930.
Application and certification of commercial applicators.

No person shall use (except under supervised conditions of training for certification) or supervise the use of any pesticide in exchange for compensation of any kind other than the trading of personal services between producers of agricultural commodities without first obtaining certification as either a commercial applicator or registered technician in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. Application for a commercial applicator’s or registered technician’s certificate shall be made in writing to the Commissioner. Each application for a certificate shall contain: (i) information regarding the applicant’s qualifications and proposed operations; (ii) the classification or classifications the applicant is applying for; (iii) the full name of the applicant or, if the applicant is a member of a firm or partnership, the names of the principal officers of the association, corporation, or group; (iv) the principal business address of the applicant in the Commonwealth and elsewhere; and (v) any other information required by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall not issue a commercial applicator’s or registered technician’s certificate until the individual who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide is certified by: (i) presenting proof of completion of a training course approved by the Board and appropriate to the desired classification; and (ii) passing a written examination.

Each commercial applicator and registered technician shall be required to renew his certification biennially subject to payment of the required fee and presentation of proof of completion of a Board-approved recertification course. Reexamination or special examination may be required by the Board of any person: (i) whose certification has been suspended, revoked, or modified pursuant to subsection B of §

3.2-3940

; (ii) if significant technological developments have occurred requiring additional knowledge; (iii) when required by additional standards established by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency; (iv) when applying for a different classification of certification; or (v) when required by regulations of the Board. In the event that reexamination is required, the fee shall be no greater than that imposed for initial certification.

The Commissioner shall issue a certificate for classifications for which the applicant is qualified if he finds the applicant meets the requirements to apply pesticides in any of the classifications he has applied for; and, if the applicant is applying for a certificate to engage in aerial application, has met all of the requirements of the Federal Aviation Agency, the Department of Aviation of the Commonwealth, and any other applicable laws. The Commissioner may limit the certification of the applicant to the use of certain pesticides, or to certain areas, or to certain types of equipment if the applicant is only so qualified. If a certificate is not issued as applied for, the Commissioner shall inform the applicant in writing of the reasons within 30 days. Copies of such action shall be reported to the Board.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.4; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.52; 1993, c. 773; 2008, c. 860.

Law Review.

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

§ 3.2-3931.
Agencies or persons exempt or partially exempt.

All state agencies, municipal corporations, or other governmental agencies shall be exempt from any certification fees prescribed by this article, but remain subject to the provisions of this article and regulations adopted hereunder concerning the application of pesticides.

Individuals, employees, or representatives of such governmental agencies shall be certified as commercial applicators or registered technicians for the use of pesticides covered by the applicant’s certification. The certification shall be valid only when applying or supervising application of pesticides used by such governmental agencies.

The following persons shall be exempt from the provisions of this article: (i) persons conducting laboratory research involving restricted use pesticides; (ii) doctors of medicine or doctors of veterinary medicine applying pesticides as drugs or medication, or to control pests in corpses during the normal course of their practice; (iii) providers of janitorial, cleaning, or sanitizing services if the providers use no pesticides other than nonrestricted use sanitizers, disinfectants, and germicides; (iv) persons who apply paints containing pesticides, provided that the pesticides in the paints are not restricted use pesticides; (v) classes of persons specified by regulation who can use or supervise the use of pesticides with minimal risk to the public health and safety by virtue of their experience and knowledge regarding the safe use of pesticides; and (vi) classes of persons specified by regulation whose use or supervision of the use of pesticides can be accomplished with minimal risk to the public health and safety by virtue of the nature of the pesticides used or method of application of the pesticides.

A painter who applies restricted-use marine antifoulant paint only under the direct, on-site supervision of a commercial applicator is not required to be a commercial applicator or a registered technician, provided that one commercial applicator may not provide on-site supervision for more than eight paint applicators.

Neither the provisions of this chapter nor regulations adopted hereunder shall require the certification of any person who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide that is not a restricted use pesticide only on property owned or leased by his employer as part of his job duties. This exemption shall not apply to any person who: (i) uses or supervises the use of any pesticide on any area open to the general public at educational institutions, health care facilities, day-care facilities, or convalescent facilities; (ii) uses or supervises the use of any pesticide within any area where open food is stored, processed, or sold; (iii) uses or supervises the use of any pesticide on any recreational land over five acres in size; and (iv) is otherwise specifically required by this article to be certified as a commercial applicator.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.5; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.53; 1993, c. 773; 1995, c. 103; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to the conditional exemption of regulations adopted under this section from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4006

.

§ 3.2-3932.
Application and certification of private applicators.

It is unlawful to use or supervise the use of any pesticide classified for restricted use on any property, unless the applicator: (i) has first obtained certification from the Commissioner as a private applicator; (ii) is exempt or excepted from the requirement to be certified; or (iii) is producing an agricultural commodity while under the direct supervision of a private applicator on property owned or leased by that private applicator.

An applicator shall be required to renew his certification biennially under the classification or subclassification for which such applicator is certified. The Commissioner shall require reexamination or special examination of any applicator if: (i) certification has been suspended, revoked, or modified pursuant to §

3.2-3940

; (ii) significant technological developments have occurred requiring additional knowledge; (iii) required by additional standards established by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency; or (iv) required by regulations of the Board. To obtain recertification, the applicator shall furnish satisfactory evidence of completion of educational courses, programs, or seminars approved by the Board.

The Commissioner shall inform the applicant in writing of his decision within 30 days.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.6; 1976, c. 236; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.54; 1993, c. 773; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3933.
Certificate renewals; late fee for delinquent renewals; reexamination.

If the application for renewal of any certificate provided for in this article is not filed prior to a date established by the Board, then a late fee of 20 percent shall be added to the renewal fee and paid by the applicant before renewal. If the certificate is not renewed within 60 days following the expiration of the certificate, then the applicant must take another examination.

The Board may provide by regulation for the biennial payment of commercial applicator and registered technician certificate renewal fees.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.7; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.55; 1993, c. 773; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3934.
Reciprocal agreement.

The Commissioner may issue a certificate on a reciprocal basis to a nonresident who is licensed or certified in another state or by a federal agency substantially in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Such a certificate may be suspended or revoked as other certifications issued hereunder, and may be suspended or revoked if the nonresident’s base state or federal certification is suspended or revoked.

History.

1975, c. 377, § 3.1-249.12; 1976, c. 236; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.57; 2008, c. 860.